Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 6. Permits.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.600.
Types of permits.

A permit allows catering and serving activities for a specific period on a single specified premises and allows an eligible nonprofit organization to host a fundraising or not-for-profit event.

The director may issue only the permits authorized in AS

04.09.600

—

04.09.690

. An application for a permit must be received by the director not less than three business days before the first day of the event. Except for a conditional contractor’s permit issued under AS

04.09.690

, the director shall require every person who will serve or sell alcohol or check identification of a patron during a permitted event to complete an alcohol server education course under AS

04.21.025

before the first day of the permitted event.

An applicant for a permit must follow the application requirements set out in AS

04.11.260

.

A permit, other than an inventory resale permit under AS

04.09.680

and a conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

, is valid only on the premises, for the event, and for the period specified.

The holder of an approved permit may submit a written request for amendment of the approved permit to change the event date, site, designated area, or designated time. The holder of the approved permit shall submit the request to the director not later than three business days before the event and shall include approval of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the site of the event for which the amended permit is sought.

The holder of an approved permit shall ensure that the individuals serving alcohol have completed alcohol server training as required under AS

04.21.025

before the first day of the permitted event.

A permit may not be transferred to another person or another location and, except for a conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

, may not be renewed.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

04.09.680

for an inventory resale permit and AS

04.09.690

for a conditional contractor’s permit, the fee for a permit shall be set by the board in regulation. The fee must be at least $50 for each day of the event.

The director shall approve or deny a permit application. If the director denies a permit application, the applicant may appeal to the board.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.610.
Beverage dispensary caterer’s permit.

A beverage dispensary caterer’s permit authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license or beverage dispensary tourism license to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages at conventions, picnics, sporting activities or events, concerts, street festivals, or similar affairs held off the holder’s licensed premises for which a beverage dispensary license or beverage dispensary tourism license would not otherwise be required. The permit may be issued only for designated premises for a specific occasion and for a limited period.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.620.
Restaurant caterer’s dining permit.

A restaurant caterer’s dining permit authorizes the holder of a restaurant or eating place license or a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license to sell brewed beverages and wine before and during the service of food provided by the licensee at a single dining event held off the holder’s licensed premises.

The director may issue a restaurant caterer’s dining permit only for designated premises for a specific occasion and for a limited period.

The licensee shall provide food in conjunction with the service of brewed beverages and wine under a restaurant caterer’s dining permit. The licensee shall comply with the requirements for gross receipts from food sales for a restaurant or eating place license under AS

04.09.210(e)

or a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under AS

04.09.360(g)

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.630.
Club caterer’s permit.

A club caterer’s permit authorizes the holder of a club license to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages at an event held off the club’s licensed premises.

The application for a club caterer’s permit filed under AS

04.11.260

must be signed by two officers of the organization.

A restriction or prohibition under AS

04.09.220

regarding a club member or a guest of a club member applies at the premises covered by the permit.

The director may not issue more than three club caterer’s permits to the holder of a club license in a calendar year.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.640.
Art exhibit event permit.

An art exhibit event permit authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license, a beverage dispensary tourism license, a restaurant or eating place license, or a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license to sell and serve brewed beverages and wine for consumption at a specific art exhibit event.

The director may issue an art exhibit event permit only for a specific art exhibit event at premises designated in the application, for a limited period specified in the application.

The director may not grant more than 12 art exhibit event permits to a licensee in a calendar year.

An art exhibit event permit may not be exercised during an event that is expected to attract attendees under 21 years of age.

Food must be provided in conjunction with the service of brewed beverages and wine under an art exhibit event permit.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.645.
Music festival permit.

A music festival permit authorizes the holder of a restaurant or eating place license to sell or dispense beer and wine for consumption at a festival with multiple live music performances held off the holder’s licensed premises.

The board may issue a music festival permit to the holder of a restaurant or eating place license only if the licensed premises of the restaurant or eating place is located in the unorganized borough.

The board may issue a music festival permit only for

a designated premises and for a limited period, not to exceed four calendar days;

a music festival that has existed at the same location for a period of at least 10 years before the application for the permit is filed; and

a music festival that is located in the unorganized borough.

The board may not issue more than one music festival permit to the holder of a restaurant or eating place license in a calendar year.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.650.
Nonprofit organization event permit.

A nonprofit organization event permit authorizes the holder to sell or dispense brewed beverages or wine for consumption at an event organized by the nonprofit organization.

Only a nonprofit organization, such as a fraternal, civic, professional, or patriotic organization, that is incorporated under AS 10.20 and has been active for a period of at least two years before filing an application is eligible for a nonprofit organization event permit.

The application for a nonprofit organization event permit filed under AS

04.11.260

must be signed by two officers of the organization. The nonprofit organization shall submit, together with the application,

either a signed copy of a resolution adopted by the board of directors or a copy of the minutes from a board meeting of the nonprofit organization authorizing the application; and

a sworn affidavit showing the length of time the organization has been in existence.

The director may not issue more than five nonprofit organization event permits to a nonprofit organization, including an auxiliary of the organization, in a calendar year. A nonprofit organization event permit may be issued only for designated premises for a specific occasion and for a limited period as specified in the application.

The nonprofit organization shall ensure that all profits derived from the sale of brewed beverages or wine under a nonprofit organization event permit are paid to the organization that holds the permit and not to an individual.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.660.
Alcoholic beverage auction permit.

An alcoholic beverage auction permit authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages by outcry, silent, or online auction. An alcoholic beverage auction permit is sufficient to authorize a nonprofit organization under (b) of this section to sell alcoholic beverages by outcry, silent, or online auction, and no other permit or license is required. An alcoholic beverage auction permit may be operated on the licensed premises of a beverage dispensary license, beverage dispensary tourism license, club license, restaurant or eating place license, or seasonal restaurant or eating place license.

Only a nonprofit organization, such as a fraternal, civic, professional, or patriotic organization, that is incorporated under AS 10.20 and has been active for a period of at least two years before filing an application is eligible for an alcoholic beverage auction permit.

The application for an alcoholic beverage auction permit filed under AS

04.11.260

must be signed by two officers of the organization. The nonprofit organization shall submit, together with the application,

either a signed copy of a resolution adopted by the board of directors or a copy of the minutes of a board meeting of the nonprofit organization authorizing the application; and

a sworn affidavit showing the length of time the organization has been in existence.

The director may not issue more than five alcoholic beverage auction permits to a nonprofit organization, including an auxiliary of the organization, in a calendar year. The director may issue a permit only for designated premises for a specific event and for a limited period as specified in the application.

The nonprofit organization shall ensure that all profits derived from the sale of brewed beverages or wine under an alcoholic beverage auction permit are paid to the organization that holds the permit and not to an individual.

The nonprofit organization may not permit consumption at the auction site of the alcoholic beverages being auctioned under an alcoholic beverage auction permit.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.670.
Package store tasting event permit.

A package store tasting event permit authorizes the holder of a package store license to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages at a tasting event held on the licensed premises, or unlicensed areas of the property where the package store is located, excluding the parking lot.

A tasting event must be for the purpose of promoting products available for purchase from the package store licensee; only products sold by the package store licensee may be sold or dispensed at the event.

The director may issue a package store tasting event permit only for a specific tasting event at premises designated in the application for a limited period specified in the application.

The director may not issue more than six package store tasting event permits in a calendar year to a package store licensee. If a person holds two or more package store licenses, then the director shall treat each license as separate and distinct when applying the limitation under this subsection, regardless of how many other licenses the person holds, wholly or in part.

The director may not issue a package store tasting event permit for a period that

is longer than four hours;

ends later than 9:00 p.m.

Food must be provided in conjunction with the service of alcoholic beverages under a package store tasting event permit.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.680.
Inventory resale permit.

An inventory resale permit authorizes the holder to sell the remaining inventory of alcoholic beverages of a business when the owner of the business no longer has a valid license under this title.

The fee for an inventory resale permit is $100.

The holder of an inventory resale permit may sell the remaining alcoholic beverage inventory only to the holder of a valid license under this chapter.

The director may issue an inventory resale permit for a period ending 90 days after the date of expiration or forfeiture of the license. The director may not issue a permit if the license was suspended or revoked.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.685.
Live music or entertainment permit.

A live music or entertainment permit authorizes the holder of a brewery retail license, winery retail license, or distillery retail license to allow live music or other entertainment on the licensed premises where consumption occurs.

The director may not issue more than four live music or entertainment permits to a licensee in a calendar year. The director may issue a live music or entertainment permit only for designated premises for a specific occasion and for a limited period during a single day between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m., as specified in the application.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.690.
Conditional contractor’s permit.

A conditional contractor’s permit authorizes the holder to sell brewed beverages or wine for consumption only on designated premises for the designated period of the permit under AS

04.11.680

at construction sites that are located outside a city and inside the boundaries of a military or naval reservation.

The biennial conditional contractor’s permit fee is $1,250.

An applicant for a conditional contractor’s permit must obtain and file with the board written permission from the commanding officer of the military or naval reservation and the prime contractor of the remotely situated project for the conduct of the activities authorized by the permit. A conditional contractor’s permit may be renewed biennially upon reapplication for a permit and may be revoked or suspended at the discretion of the commanding officer or the prime contractor.

A conditional contractor’s permit may not be transferred and is not valid after the completion of the holder’s contract or the closing of the military or naval reservation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.700.
Failure to comply with a permit requirement.

A person who engages in activity that requires a permit under AS

04.09.600

—

04.09.690

without having a permit and a person who violates the terms of a permit issued under AS

04.09.600

—

04.09.690

commits the offense of failure to comply with a permit requirement.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, failure to comply with a permit requirement is a violation.

Failure to comply with a permit requirement of an inventory resale permit under AS

04.09.680

or a conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

is a violation punishable by a fine of $500.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)